Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Criminal Penalties.

§ 59.1-395.
Unlawful conduct of wagering.

Any person not licensed under subdivision 5 of § 59.1-369 or under Article 2 (§ 59.1-375 et seq.) of this chapter who conducts pari-mutuel wagering, or horse racing on which wagering is conducted with his knowledge or consent, shall be guilty of a Class
4 felony.

History.
1988, c. 855; 2003, c. 682.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 682 substituted “under subdivision 5 of § 59.1-369 or under Article 2 (§ 59.1-375 et seq.) of this chapter” for “hereunder.”

§ 59.1-396.
Fraudulent use of credential.

Any person other than the lawful holder thereof who has in his possession any credential, license or permit issued by the Commission, or a forged or simulated credential, license or permit of the Commission, and who uses such credential, license or permit
for the purpose of misrepresentation, fraud or touting is guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Any credential, license or permit issued by the Commission, if used by the holder thereof for a purpose other than identification and in the performance of legitimate duties on a racetrack or within a satellite facility, shall be automatically revoked
whether so used on or off a racetrack or satellite facility.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1992, c. 820.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 59.1-397.
Unlawful transmission of information.

Any person who knowingly transmits information as to the progress or results of a horse race, or information as to wagers, betting odds, post or off times, or jockey changes in any race by any means whatsoever for the purposes of carrying on illegal gambling
operations as defined in §

18.2-325

, or to a person engaged in illegal gambling operations shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a newspaper from printing such results or information as news, or any television or radio station from telecasting or broadcasting such results or information as news. This section shall not be so construed
as to place in jeopardy any common carrier or its agents performing operations within the scope of a public franchise, or any gambling operation authorized by law.

History.
1988, c. 855.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 59.1-398.
Touting.

Any person, who knowingly and designedly by false representation attempts to, or does persuade, procure or cause another person to wager on a horse in a race to be run in this Commonwealth or elsewhere, and upon which money is wagered in this Commonwealth,
and who asks or demands compensation as a reward for information or purported information given in such case, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
1988, c. 855.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 59.1-399.
Bribing of a jockey, driver or other participant.

Any person who gives, promises or offers to any jockey, driver, groom or any person participating in any race meeting, including owners of racetracks and their employees, stewards, trainers, judges, starters and special policemen, any valuable thing with
intent to influence him to attempt to lose or cause to be lost a horse race in which such person is taking part or expects to take part, or has any duty or connection, or who, being either jockey, driver, or groom or participant in
a race meeting, solicits or accepts any valuable thing to influence him to lose or cause to be lost a horse race in which he is taking part, or expects to take part, or has any duty or connection, shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.
1988, c. 855.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 59.1-400.
Prohibited acts, administration of drugs, etc.; penalty.

Any person who, with the intent to defraud, acts to alter the outcome of a race by (i) the administration of any substance foreign to the natural horse, except those substances specifically permitted by the regulations of the Virginia Racing Commission,
or (ii) the use of any device, electrical or otherwise, except those specifically permitted by the regulations of the Virginia Racing Commission, shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Any person who, with the intent to defraud, influences or conspires with another to alter the outcome of a race by (i) the administration of any substance foreign to the natural horse, except those substances specifically permitted by the regulations
of the Virginia Racing Commission, or (ii) the use of any device, electrical or otherwise, except those specifically permitted by the regulations of the Virginia Racing Commission, shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Any person who (i) administers any substance foreign to the natural horse, except those substances specifically permitted by the regulations of the Virginia Racing Commission, when the horse is entered to start, or (ii) at any time, exposes any substance
foreign to the natural horse with the intent of impeding or increasing the speed, endurance, health, or condition of a horse, shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1990, c. 366.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 59.1-401.
Possessing drugs.

The possession or transportation of any drug except those permitted by regulations of the Commission within the racing enclosure is prohibited except upon a bona fide veterinarian’s prescription with complete statement of uses and purposes on the container.
A copy of such prescription shall be filed with the stewards. Any person knowingly violating the provisions of this section relating to the legal possession of drugs shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The provisions of the Drug
Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.) shall apply in situations where drugs regulated by that Act are within the racing enclosure.

History.
1988, c. 855.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 59.1-402.
Racing under false name; penalty.

Any person who knowingly enters or races any horse in any running or harness race under any name or designation other than the name or designation assigned to such horse by and registered with the Jockey Club, the United States Trotting Association, the
American Quarter Horse Association, or other applicable association or who knowingly instigates, engages in, or in any way furthers any act by which any horse is entered or raced in any running or trotting race under any name or designation
other than the name or designation duly assigned by and registered with the Jockey Club, the United States Trotting Association, the American Quarter Horse Association, or other applicable association, is guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1990, c. 351.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 59.1-403.
Prohibition on persons under 21 years of age; penalty.

No person shall wager on or conduct any wagering on the outcome of a horse race pursuant to the provisions of this chapter unless such person is 18 years of age or older. No person shall accept any wager from a minor. No person shall be admitted into
a satellite facility if such person is under 18 years of age unless accompanied by one of his parents or his legal guardian. No person under 21 years of age shall use any electronic gaming terminal or other electronic device in a satellite
facility to wager on or conduct any wagering on historical horse racing. Violation of this section shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1996, cc. 915, 1025; 2022, cc. 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “18 years” for “eighteen years” twice; and added the fourth sentence.

§ 59.1-404.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 591.

Cross references.

As to present provision relating to punishment for making a false statement to the Commission, see § 59.1-377.

As to present provisions relating to suspension or revocation of license and criminal liability for violations, see §§ 59.1-385 and 59.1-390.

§ 59.1-405.
Conspiracies and attempts to commit violations.

Any person who conspires, confederates or combines with another, either within or without this Commonwealth, to commit a felony prohibited by this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Any person who attempts to commit any act prohibited by this article shall be guilty of a criminal offense and punished as provided in either §§

18.2-26

,

18.2-27

or §

18.2-28

, as appropriate.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1991, c. 591.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Operation of satellite facility. —

If the Virginia Racing Commission issues a license to operate a racetrack and/or a satellite facility, the clear definition of the term “simulcast horse racing” permits the licensee to operate a satellite facility on a daily basis pursuant to the terms
of the license. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 99-105, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (2/11/00).